Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.900

Construction—1971 ex.s. c 46.

The provisions of this chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purposes to make uniform the law of those states which enact it, to the extent which it has been enacted by this state.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 27.]